da: Kompatibelt tovantal: 3 reb; 4 reb; Universal; Andet
bg-BG: Брой съвместими въжета: С 3 въжета; С 4 въжета; Универсален; Друг
it: Numero di corde compatibili: 3 corde; 4 corde; Universale; Altro
ru: Совместимое количество канатов: 3 веревки; 4 веревки; Универсальный; Другое
th: จำนวนเชือกที่เข้ากันได้: เชือก 3 เส้น; เชือก 4 เส้น; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Número de cordas compatíveis: 3 cordas; 4 cordas; Universal; Outro
ja: 互換性のあるロープ数: 3ロープ; 4ロープ; ユニバーサル; その他
es: Número de cuerdas compatibles: 3 cuerdas; 4 cuerdas; Universal; Otro
sl-SI: Združljivo število vrvi: 3 vrvi; 4 vrvi; Univerzalno; Drugo
nb: Kompatibelt tauantall: 3-tau; 4-tau; Universell; Annet
sv: Kompatibelt repantal: 3-rep; 4-rep; Universell; Övrigt
fr: Nombre de cordes compatible: 3 cordes; 4 cordes; Universel; Autre
pl: Kompatybilna liczba lin: 3 liny; 4 liny; Uniwersalne; Inne
cs: Kompatibilní počet lan: 3 lana; 4 lana; Univerzální; Jiné
hr-HR: Kompatibilan broj užeta: 3 užeta; 4 užeta; Univerzalno; Ostalo
fi: Yhteensopiva köysien lukumäärä: 3-köysinen; 4-köysinen; Universaali; Muu
lt-LT: Suderinamas virvių skaičius: 3 virvių; 4 virvių; Universali; Kita
en: Compatible rope count: 3-rope; 4-rope; Universal; Other
ro-RO: Număr compatibil de frânghii: 3 corzi; 4 corzi; Universal; Altele
vi: Số lượng dây tương thích: 3 dây; 4 dây; Đa năng; Khác
de: Kompatible Seilanzahl: 3-Seil; 4-Seil; Universal; Sonstige
zh-CN: 适配拳台绳数: 3 股绳; 4 股绳; 通用; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis kötélszám: 3 köteles; 4 köteles; Univerzális; Egyéb
sk-SK: Kompatibilné množstvo lana: 3-lanové; 4-lanové; Univerzálne; Iné
el: Συμβατός αριθμός σχοινιών: 3 σχοινιών; 4 σχοινιών; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pt-BR: Número de cordas compatíveis: 3 cordas; 4 cordas; Universal; Outro
nl: Compatibel aantal touwen: 3 touwen; 4 touwen; Universeel; Overige
ko: 호환 로프 수: 3-로프; 4-로프; 범용; 기타
tr: Uyumlu halat sayısı: 3 halatlı; 4 halatlı; Evrensel; Diğer
zh-TW: 相容圍繩數量: 3 繩; 4 繩; 通用; 其他